Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1224.
do enact as follows:AB1224,11Section 1. 13.94 (1) (ew) of the statutes is created to read:AB1224,2,7213.94 (1) (ew) Annually, perform a financial audit of the health plan under ch. 356, including an analysis of the sufficiency of the health plan’s reserves. Within 30 4days after completion of the audit, the legislative audit bureau shall submit a 5detailed report of the audit to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2), the governor, the 6department of administration, the department of health services, and the 7department of revenue.AB1224,28Section 2. 15.01 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1224,3,14115.01 (6) “Division,” “bureau,” “section,” and “unit” means the subunits of a 2department or an independent agency, whether specifically created by law or 3created by the head of the department or the independent agency for the more 4economic and efficient administration and operation of the programs assigned to 5the department or independent agency. The office of credit unions in the 6department of financial institutions, the office of the inspector general in the 7department of children and families, the office of the inspector general in the 8department of health services, the office of the ombudsman for patient advocacy in 9the department of health services, and the office of children’s mental health in the 10department of health services have the meaning of “division” under this subsection. 11The office of the long-term care ombudsman under the board on aging and long-12term care and the office of educational accountability and the office of literacy in 13the department of public instruction have the meaning of “bureau” under this 14subsection.AB1224,315Section 3. 15.193 (2) of the statutes is created to read:AB1224,3,201615.193 (2) Office of the ombudsman for patient advocacy. There is 17created in the department of health services an office of the ombudsman for patient 18advocacy. The ombudsman shall be appointed by the secretary of health services 19and may be removed only for just cause. An individual may not serve as 20ombudsman while holding another public office.AB1224,421Section 4. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 22insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1224,510Section 5. 20.435 (10) of the statutes is created to read:AB1224,4,121120.435 (10) Health plan. (a) General program operations. The amounts in 12the schedule for general program operations.AB1224,4,1413(b) Office of the ombudsman for patient advocacy. The amounts in the 14schedule for the operations of the office of the ombudsman for patient advocacy.AB1224,4,1715(q) Health plan benefits; administration. From the health plan fund, the 16amounts in the schedule for administration, enrollment determinations, and 17provision of benefits under the health plan administered under ch. 56. AB1224,4,1918(r) Capital expenditures. From the health plan fund, the amounts in the 19schedule for capital expenditures for institutional providers under s. 56.10 (4) (c).AB1224,620Section 6. 25.17 (1) (gt) of the statutes is created to read:AB1224,4,212125.17 (1) (gt) Health plan fund (s. 25.76);AB1224,722Section 7. 25.76 of the statutes is created to read:AB1224,4,242325.76 Health plan fund. There is created a separate, nonlapsible trust fund 24designated as the health plan fund, consisting of all of the following:AB1224,5,11(1) All amounts deposited under s. 56.12.AB1224,5,32(2) All federal payments received by the state to fund health care services in 3this state, subject to any federal waiver granted under s. 56.02 (2) (a) or (3).AB1224,5,44(3) All donations, gifts, and bequests made to the fund.AB1224,5,55(4) All moneys transferred to the fund from other funds.AB1224,5,66(5) All income and interest earned by the fund.AB1224,87Section 8. Chapter 56 of the statutes is created to read:AB1224,5,98CHAPTER 569HEALTH PLANAB1224,5,101056.01 Definitions. In this chapter:AB1224,5,1211(1) “Covered benefit” means a benefit under s. 56.05 (1) or (3) that is provided 12to an enrollee.AB1224,5,1313(2) “Department” means the department of health services.AB1224,5,1514(3) “Enrollee” means an individual who is enrolled in the health plan under 15this chapter.AB1224,5,1616(4) “Health plan fund” means the fund created under s. 25.76.AB1224,5,1717(5) “Health plan” means the plan described under s. 56.03.AB1224,5,2018(6) “Institutional provider” means a health care facility located in this state 19that provides overnight care, including a hospital, nursing facility, or inpatient 20rehabilitation facility.AB1224,5,2421(7) “Medically necessary” means necessary to promote health and to prevent, 22diagnose, or treat a particular patient’s medical condition in a manner that meets 23accepted standards of medical practice in a health care provider’s professional peer 24group and geographic region.AB1224,6,21(8) “Noninstitutional provider” means a health care facility located in this 2state that does not provide overnight care. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1224 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1224 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1224 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1224 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1224: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting